Lecture7/tagalog.twolc
Alphabet p t k l h a i u %+:0
         R:p R:t R:k E:a E:i E:u ;

Rule-variables CC VV ;

Sets
    Vowel = a i u ;  ! add more as needed
        Cons = p t k ;   ! add more as needed

Rules

"R realization as a consonant"
R:CC <=> _ E: %+: CC ; where CC in Cons ;

"E realization as a vowel"
E:VV <=> _ %+: (Cons:) VV ; where VV in Vowel ;
